Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4969.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "kratom consumer
protection act".
Sec. 3. As used in this act:
(a) "Certified independent third-party laboratory" means a
laboratory that is accredited to the International Organization for
Standardization, ISO/IEC 17025 standard, by an accreditation body
recognized by the International Laboratory Accreditation
Cooperation.
RMH H04479'25 (H-2) 87n5op


(b) "Kratom extract" means a substance or compound that meets
all of the following criteria:
(i) Is obtained by extraction of the Mitragyna speciosa leaf.
(ii) Contains more than trace amounts of Mitragyna speciosa and
other alkaloids of the Mitragyna speciosa plant.
(iii) Is intended for ingestion.
(iv) Does not contain any controlled substances or levels of
residual solvents higher than is allowed under the United States
Pharmacopeia 467.
(c) "Kratom leaf" means the leaf of the Mitragyna speciosa
plant in fresh or dehydrated form.
(d) "Kratom product" means a consumable product that contains
any part of the kratom leaf or kratom extract. A kratom product is
not considered a food under the food law, 2000 PA 92, MCL 289.1101
to 289.8111.
Sec. 5. A person that sells a kratom product must label the
kratom product, and the label must clearly and conspicuously
provide the following information:
(a) The following statements:
(i) A statement against the use of the kratom product by
individuals who are under 21 years, who are pregnant, or who are
breastfeeding.
(ii) A statement that kratom may be habit forming.
(iii) A statement that reads as follows: "These statements have
not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration. This
product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any
disease."
(b) Directions for use of the kratom product that include, but
are not limited to, all of the following:
RMH H04479'25 (H-2) 87n5op


(i) A recommended serving size that is clearly described on the
label for each form of kratom product, such as capsules, gummies,
prepacked single-serving units, or similar product forms. If the
kratom product is a beverage, liquid, or loose powder, the label
must include clear instructions or a mark on the package or
container that clearly designates the recommended serving size.
(ii) The recommended number of servings that can be safely
consumed in a 24-hour period.
(iii) The recommended number of servings per container.
(iv) A list of the kratom alkaloid content and other
ingredients in the kratom product that includes quantitative, not
to exceed declarations of the amount per serving of each of the
following:
(A) Mitragynine.
(B) 7-hydroxymitragynine.
Sec. 7. A person shall not manufacture, process, distribute,
sell, or offer for sale or distribution, in person or through an
online website, any of the following:
(a) A kratom product that contains a level of 7-
hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is greater than 2%
of the alkaloid composition of the kratom product.
(b) A kratom product that contains a synthesized material,
such as an alkaloid, metabolite, or alkaloid derivative that is
created by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means, which
includes, but is not limited to, fermentation, recombinant
techniques, yeast-derived, or enzymatic techniques, rather than
traditional food preparation techniques, such as heating or
extracting, that synthetically alters the composition of kratom
alkaloid or constituent.
RMH H04479'25 (H-2) 87n5op


(c) A kratom product that does not include on its package or
label the amount of mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine contained
in the kratom product.
(d) A kratom product that contains a kratom extract that was
manufactured using extraction solvents that contain levels of
residual solvents higher than is allowed under the United States
Pharmacopeia 467 and not manufactured using food-grade solvents
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
Sec. 9. (1) Before a kratom product can be distributed, sold,
or offered for distribution or sale, a person that manufactures or
processes a kratom product shall have the kratom product tested by
a certified independent third-party laboratory to ensure that the
kratom product complies with the requirements of this act. If the
kratom product complies with the requirements of this act, the
certified independent third-party laboratory shall issue the person
a certificate of analysis.
(2) The person shall maintain a certification of analysis
issued under this section for 10 years and make the certificate of
analysis available to a law enforcement officer on request. If a
law enforcement officer makes a request to review a certificate of
analysis issued under this section, the person shall produce the
certificate of analysis within 30 days after the request is made.
Sec. 11. A person that violates section 5, 7, or 9 may be
ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for the
first offense and not more than $5,000.00 for a second or
subsequent offense. The prosecutor of the county in which the
violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to
collect the fine. A fine collected under this section must be
exclusively applied to the support of public libraries and county
RMH H04479'25 (H-2) 87n5op


law libraries in the same manner as is provided by law for penal
fines assessed and collected for violation of a penal law of this
state.
Final Page
RMH H04479'25 (H-2) 87n5op